Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.150

Assessments—Collection—Deposit in local fund—Gifts, grants, and endowments—Failure to remit assessment.

(1) All assessments shall be collected by the commission on a quarterly basis or as otherwise determined by the commission.

(2) The commission shall create a local fund in a local financial institution approved by the director and shall deposit therein, each day, all moneys received by the commission except an amount for petty cash as fixed by commission regulations. Moneys in the fund shall only be expended for the purposes of this chapter. Moneys in the fund are not subject to appropriation.

(3) The commission fund is authorized to receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

(4) If an affected person fails to remit any assessment, such assessment plus interest at the rate of one percent per month from the due date shall constitute a personal debt of the person assessed or who otherwise owes the assessment and shall be due and payable within thirty days from the date it becomes first due the commission. In the event of failure of the person to pay due and payable assessments, the commission may bring civil action against the person in a state court of competent jurisdiction for collection thereof, together with any reasonable costs including attorneys' fees. The action shall be tried and judgment rendered as in any other cause of action for debt due and payable. This provision is in addition to the penalty section contained in RCW 15.62.220.

[ 1989 c 5 s 15.]